Hawaii statutes.
§200-10 Permits and fees
for state small boat harbors; permit transfers.
(a) No person shall moor a vessel in a state
small boat harbor without:

(1) First obtaining a use permit from the department;
and

(2) Being the owner of the vessel.

(b) In order to obtain a
permit or a permit renewal, the
owner of a vessel shall provide, at the owner's own expense:

(1) A marine surveyor's inspection or a vessel
inspection by the department, no more than two years old, certifying that the
vessel has been inspected and fulfills the requirements set by the department;

(2) Documentation that the person is the owner of the
vessel. The documentation shall meet requirements established by the
department; and

(3) Satisfactory proof that the person has attained
the age of eighteen years prior to obtaining a permit or being placed on the
waitlist for a permit.

(c)
The permittee shall pay moorage fees to the department for the use permit that
shall be based on but not limited to the use of the vessel, its effect on the
harbor, use of facilities, and the cost of administering this mooring program;
and, furthermore:

(1) Except for commercial maritime activities where
there is a tariff established by the department of transportation, moorage fees
shall be established by appraisal by a state-licensed appraiser approved by the
department and shall be higher for nonresidents than for residents. The
moorage fees shall be set by appraisal categories schedule A and schedule B, to
be determined by the department, and may be increased annually by the
department, to reflect a cost-of-living index increase; provided that:

(A) Schedule A shall include existing mooring
permittees; and

(B) Schedule B shall apply to all new mooring
applicants and transient slips on or after July 1, 2011;

provided further that schedule A rates shall be
increased by the same amount each year so that schedule A rates equal schedule
B rates by July 1, 2014;

(2) For commercial maritime activities where there is
a tariff established by the harbors division of the department of
transportation, the department may adopt the published tariff of the harbors
division of the department of transportation or establish the fee by appraisal
by a state-licensed appraiser approved by the department;

(3) An application fee shall be collected when
applying for moorage in state small boat harbors and shall thereafter be
collected annually when the application is renewed. The application fee shall
be:

(A) Set by the department; and

(B) Not less than $100 for nonresidents;

(4) If a recreational vessel is used as a place of
principal habitation, the permittee shall pay, in addition to the moorage fee,
a liveaboard fee that shall be calculated at a rate of:

(A) $5.20 a foot of vessel length a month if
the permittee is a state resident; and

(B) $7.80 a foot of vessel length a month if
the permittee is a nonresident;

provided that the liveaboard fees established by
this paragraph may be increased by the department at the rate of the annual
cost-of-living index, but not more than five per cent in any one year,
beginning July 1 of each year;

(5) If a vessel is used for commercial purposes from
its permitted mooring, the permittee shall pay, in lieu of the moorage and
liveaboard fee, a fee based on three per cent of the gross revenues derived
from the use of the vessel or two times the moorage fee assessed for a
recreational vessel of the same size, whichever is greater; and

(6) The department is authorized to assess and
collect utility fees, including electrical and water charges, and common-area
maintenance fees in small boat harbors.

(d)
The department shall not renew or issue a permit to a person who is not the
owner of the vessel which is moored or which the person desires to moor in a
state small boat harbor. No use permit may be transferred unless specifically
provided by law. Any individual who is an owner of a vessel used for
commercial purposes, including commercial fishing as a principal means of
livelihood, and possesses a valid mooring permit or commercial permit, or both,
in accordance with the rules adopted by the chairperson pursuant to chapter 91,
may transfer ownership of the vessel from personal ownership to corporate or
other business ownership without terminating the right to moor or operate the vessel
under the permit or permits. The existing permit or permits shall be reissued
in the name of the transferee corporation or other business entity.

(e)
For the purposes of this section, "person" means any individual,
firm, partnership, corporation, trust, association, joint venture,
organization, institution, or any other legal entity, and "owner"
includes the legal owner of a vessel where there is no security interest held
by anyone on the vessel, a buyer under a purchase money security interest, a
debtor under any security interest, a demise charterer of a vessel, or a lessee
or charterer of a vessel under a lease or charter which provides the lessee or
charterer with exclusive right to possession of the vessel to the exclusion of
the lessor or the person from whom the vessel is chartered. "Controlled
group" means parent-subsidiary corporations, brother-sister corporations,
or constructive owner. "Transfer" includes any change in control, by
whatever means, of any entity that owns or controls, directly or indirectly, a
use permit. No permittee shall be allowed to moor a leased vessel in a berth
unless the terms of the lease are set at fair market value. A "legal
owner" includes a person who holds unencumbered title to a vessel or is a
secured party under a security interest in the vessel. An owner who is issued
a permit to moor a vessel in a state small boat harbor shall notify the
department in writing of a transfer of interest or possession in the vessel
within seven days of transfer.

(f)
Any person owning an interest in a corporation or other business entity or is
part of a controlled group possessing a valid commercial permit issued by the
department, in accordance with rules adopted by the chairperson pursuant to
chapter 91, may transfer any or all stock or other interest to another person
without terminating the right of the corporation or business entity to retain
or renew its commercial permit or any other permit issued to it by the
department; provided that:

(1) The corporation or business entity has been
engaged in the same commercial vessel activity, as defined in section 200-9,
for a minimum of one year;

(2) The seller shall pay the department a business
transfer fee based on the passenger-carrying capacity of the vessels owned or
operated by the corporation or business entity as provided by rules adopted by
the chairperson pursuant to chapter 91, except for transfers of stock or
interest in a corporation or other business entity between spouses or
first-generation lineal descendants; and

(3) In the case of a controlled group, the transferee
must retain eighty per cent control of the transferor.

Any person possessing a commercial
permit shall be required to meet minimum revenue standards, as a condition of
retaining or renewing the commercial permit.

(g)
The department may designate moorage space within state small boat harbors to
accommodate commercial fishing vessels and transient vessels.

(h)
All revenues from the foregoing operations shall be deposited in the boating
special fund. [L 1991, c 272, pt of §2; am L 2005, c 126, §1; am L 2011, c 197,
§7; am L 2014, c 10, §1
and c 84, §1; am L 2015, c 90, §1]

Case Notes

A vessel
and its accompanying mooring and live-aboard permits are constitutionally
protected "property", of which an individual may not be deprived
without notice and an opportunity to be heard. 91 H. 1, 979 P.2d 586.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next